Missouri, session 2026, HB3074.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.509, to read as follows:
9.509. April thirtieth each year is hereby designated as "William Lacy Clay Sr.
2 Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
3 events and activities to celebrate the life and legacy of William Lacy Clay Sr., who
4 represented Missouri's first district in Congress from 1969 to 2001 and was one of the
5 founding members of the Congressional Black Caucus.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.